New York, session 2025-2026, S2435.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 170-i 2 to read as follows: 3 § 170-i. Joint meeting of the governor and the assembly; joint meeting 4 of the governor and the senate. 1. Once each odd-numbered month, from 5 January through June or during the pendency of the regular legislative 6 session, whichever is longer, and on a regular or special session day, 7 at the invitation of the speaker and minority leader of the assembly, 8 and upon agreement by the speaker and the governor as to the date and 9 time, the governor, for no less than one hour, shall publicly answer 10 questions pertaining to the strategic direction, financial status and 11 general governance of the state from members of the assembly in the 12 assembly chamber. The percentage of time allotted for questions from 13 members of the majority and minority parties shall be allotted based on 14 the percentage of representation of each party in the assembly. The 15 speaker and the minority leader shall determine, for the time allotted 16 to each, which members of the assembly shall ask questions and the order 17 in which the questions shall be asked. 18 2. Once each even-numbered month, from January through June or during 19 the pendency of the regular legislative session, whichever is longer, 20 and on a regular or special session day, at the invitation of the tempo- 21 rary president and the minority leader of the senate, and upon agreement 22 by the temporary president and the governor as to the date and time, the 23 governor, for no less than one hour, shall publicly answer questions 24 pertaining to the strategic direction, financial status and general EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05647-01-5 S. 2435 2 1 governance of the state from members of the senate in the senate cham- 2 ber. The percentage of time allotted for questions from members of the 3 majority and minority parties shall be allotted based on the percentage 4 of representation of each party in the senate. The temporary president 5 of the senate and the minority leader shall determine, for the time 6 allotted to each, which members of the senate shall ask questions and 7 the order in which the questions shall be asked. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.